District of Columbia statutes.
31-4803

Policies — Incontestability.

Every such policy shall be incontestable upon any ground relating to health after 2 years from its date of issue (notwithstanding a longer period may be named therein), provided the insured shall be alive at the end of said period. If the policy by its terms shall be incontestable after a shorter period than herein provided the terms of the policy with regard to such period of limitation shall govern.

June 4, 1934, 48 Stat. 834, ch. 373, § 3
Formal requisites of insurance policies, see § 31-4703 et seq.
This section is referenced in § 31-3609.
1981 Ed., § 35-903.
1973 Ed., § 35-1003.